Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-4612
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Pharmacy Benefit Manager Licensure and Regulation Act.

Laws 2022, LB767, § 12.